Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
FRESH FRUITS, VEGETABLES,

NUTS,
HONEY, AND COFFEE

Note

Part heading amended by L 2008, c 167, §2.

§147-1 Definitions. As used in this
part, the term:

"Agricultural commodity" means fresh
fruits and fresh vegetables of every kind and character, whether or not frozen
or packed in ice, whether produced in the State or imported, nuts, and coffee,
whether cherry or parchment, or green beans, which have been produced in the
State, and raw unprocessed honey, whether produced in the State or imported.

"Consumer" means any person or firm
purchasing agricultural commodities for human consumption or animal
consumption.

"Department" means the department of
agriculture.

"Offgrade" is a descriptive term
applicable to agricultural commodities which have a market value, and
designates a quality lower than the lowest applicable in Hawaii, other states
or the United States grade for each agricultural commodity.

"Produce dealer" means any person
other than a producer who is engaged in the selling, marketing, or distributing
of any agricultural commodity or in the business of soliciting or negotiating
the sale of any farm product, but does not include any person selling solely at
retail. For the purposes of this definition, sales to the United States army or
navy, restaurants, hotels, hospitals, or other institutions are not retail
sales.

"Producer" means any person engaged
within the State in the growing or production for market of any agricultural
commodity, or any cooperative association of such persons.

"Raw unprocessed honey" means honey
that has not been heated above one hundred twenty degrees Fahrenheit, or
filtered through a fine screen of less than one-sixty-fourth inch mesh, or
treated with diatomaceous earth, or in any other way that results in the loss
of any natural constituent of honey, such as plant pollen and enzymes. [L 1945,
c 252, §1; RL 1955, §22-1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 64, §1 and c
132, §2; am L 1965, c 73, §§1 to 3; HRS §147-1; am L 1983, c 257, §2; am L
2008, c 167, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next